Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.61, subdivision 31, is amended to read: Subd. 31. Prepared food. "Prepared food" means food that meets either of the following conditions: (1) the food is sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws; or (2) the food is sold in a heated state or heated by the seller or two or more food ingredients are mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item, except for: (i) bakery items, including, but not limited to, bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, tortillas; (ii) ready-to-eat meat and seafood in an unheated state sold by weight; (iii) eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its food code so as to prevent food borne illnesses; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (iv) food that is only sliced, repackaged, or pasteurized by the sellerdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (v) food sold by a seller whose proper primary NAICS classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2026. new text end